Utah statutes.
24-1-18.   Criminal Forfeiture Restricted Account.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the Criminal Forfeiture Restricted Account.

(2)  Proceeds from forfeited property and forfeited money through state forfeitures shall be deposited in this account.

(3)  Money in the account shall be appropriated to the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice for implementing the Crime Reduction Assistance Program under Section 24-1-19.



Enacted by Chapter 296, 2004 General Session

